Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-321.02
Utilization-of-funds member, defined.

Utilization-of-funds member shall mean a member of the organization who shall be responsible for supervising the conduct of the lottery by the sale of pickle cards and for the proper utilization of the gross proceeds derived from the conduct of the lottery by the sale of pickle cards.

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 69.